Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.272

Opportunity grant program—Student eligibility—Funding—Performance measures—Documentation—Annual summary.

(1) To be eligible for participation in the opportunity grant program established in RCW 28B.50.271, a student must:

(a) Be a Washington resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 enrolled in an opportunity grant-eligible program of study;

(b) Have a family income that is at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level using the most current guidelines available from the United States department of health and human services, and be determined to have financial need based on the free application for federal student aid; and

(c) Meet such additional selection criteria as the college board shall establish in order to operate the program within appropriated funding levels.

(2) Upon enrolling, the student must provide evidence of commitment to complete the program. The student must make satisfactory progress and maintain a cumulative 2.0 grade point average for continued eligibility. If a student's cumulative grade point average falls below 2.0, the student may petition the institution of higher education of attendance. The qualified institution of higher education has the authority to establish a probationary period until such time as the student's grade point average reaches required standards.

(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, public qualified institutions of higher education shall receive an enhancement of one thousand five hundred dollars for each full-time equivalent student enrolled in the opportunity grant program whose income is below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. The funds shall be used for individualized support services which may include, but are not limited to, college and career advising, tutoring, emergency child care, and emergency transportation. The qualified institution of higher education is expected to help students access all financial resources and support services available to them through alternative sources.

(4) The college board shall be accountable for student retention and completion of opportunity grant-eligible programs of study. It shall set annual performance measures and targets and monitor the performance at all qualified institutions of higher education. The college board must reduce funding at institutions of higher education that do not meet targets for two consecutive years, based on criteria developed by the college board.

(5) The college board and office of student financial assistance shall work together to ensure that students participating in the opportunity grant program are informed of all other state and federal financial aid to which they may be entitled while receiving an opportunity grant.

(6) The college board and office of student financial assistance shall document the amount of opportunity grant assistance and the types and amounts of other sources of financial aid received by participating students. Annually, they shall produce a summary of the data.

(7) The college board shall:

(a) Begin developing the program no later than August 1, 2007, with student enrollment to begin no later than January 14, 2008; and

(b) Submit a progress report to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

(8) The college board may, in implementing the opportunity grant program, accept, use, and expend or dispose of contributions of money, services, and property. All such moneys received by the college board for the program must be deposited in an account at a depository approved by the state treasurer. Only the college board or a duly authorized representative thereof may authorize expenditures from this account. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of moneys in the account.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 157; 2007 c 277 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Part headings not law—2007 c 277: See notes following RCW 28B.50.271.